Wisconsin, session 2025, SB275.
do enact as follows:SB275,1Section 1. 227.135 (1) (g) of the statutes is created to read:227.135 (1) (g) A statement as to whether the statement of scope will be for a proposed emergency rule or for a proposed permanent rule. An agency that intends to concurrently promulgate an emergency rule and a permanent rule shall prepare separate statements of scope.SB275,2Section 2. 227.135 (5) of the statutes is renumbered 227.135 (5) (a) and amended to read:227.135 (5) (a) A statement of scope for a proposed permanent rule shall expire on the date that is 30 months after the date on which it is published in the register. After a statement of scope for a proposed permanent rule expires, an agency may not submit a proposed rule based upon that statement of scope to the legislature for review under s. 227.19 (2), and any such rule that has not been submitted to the legislature for review before that date shall be considered withdrawn on that date as provided in s. 227.14 (6) (c) 1. a. For purposes of this subsection paragraph, a revised statement of scope prepared under sub. (4) for a proposed permanent rule shall expire on the date that is 30 months after the date on which the revised statement is published in the register.SB275,3Section 3. 227.135 (5) (b) of the statutes is created to read:227.135 (5) (b) A statement of scope for a proposed emergency rule shall expire on the date that is 6 months after the date on which it is published in the register. After a statement of scope for a proposed emergency rule expires, an agency may not promulgate a proposed emergency rule based upon that statement of scope. For purposes of this paragraph, a revised statement of scope prepared under sub. (4) for a proposed emergency rule shall expire on the date that is 6 months after the date on which the revised statement is published in the register.SB275,4Section 4. 227.135 (7) of the statutes is created to read:227.135 (7) An agency may not promulgate more than one permanent rule or one emergency rule based on a statement of scope.SB275,5Section 5. 227.14 (6) (c) 1. a. of the statutes is amended to read:227.14 (6) (c) 1. a. If the proposed rule is not submitted to the legislature for review under s. 227.19 (2) before the statement of the scope of the proposed rule expires as provided in s. 227.135 (5) (a), on the date that statement of scope expires.SB275,6Section 6. Initial applicability.(1) This act first applies to a statement of scope that is published in the Wisconsin Administrative Register on the effective date of this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb275 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb275 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB275 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB275 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB275: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting